District of Columbia statutes.
32-803

Additional duties of Board under this subchapter.

The Board, in addition to its duties defined in subchapter I of Chapter 10 of this title shall administer the provisions of this subchapter and shall have power to make such inspections and investigations as it may deem necessary; collect and compile statistical information; require employers to keep their places of employment reasonably safe; require employers to keep such records as it may deem advisable and to furnish the Board with complete, detailed reports relative to all accidents. The Council of the District of Columbia shall have power to determine and fix reasonable standards of safety in employment, places of employment, in the use of devices and safeguards, and in the use of practices, means, methods, operations, and processes of employment; promulgate general rules and regulations based upon such standards and fix the minimum safety requirements which shall be complied with by employers within the purview of this subchapter. To promote the safety of persons employed in existing buildings or other existing structures, such rules, regulations, and standards may require, without limitation, changes in the permanent or temporary features of such buildings or other structures.

History

Sept. 19, 1918, ch. 174, title II, § 3
Oct. 14, 1941, 55 Stat. 738, ch. 438,§ 3
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1936, Pub. L. 91-650, title V, § 501(2)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-223.
1973 Ed., § 36-433.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 32-801.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 (283) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.